Oklahoma, session 2025, SB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 304, as last


amended by Section 3, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 304), is amended to read as follows:


Section 304. As used in the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act:


1. “Public body” means the governing bodies of all


municipalities located within this state, boards of county


commissioners of the counties in this state, boards of public and


higher education in this state and all boards, bureaus, commissions,


agencies, trusteeships, authorities, councils, committees, public


trusts or any entity created by a public trust including any

Req. No. 1084 Page 1


committee or subcommittee composed of any of the members of a public


trust or other legal entity receiving funds from the Rural Economic


Action Plan Fund as authorized by Section 2007 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, task forces or study groups in this state


supported in whole or in part by public funds or entrusted with the


expending of public funds, or administering public property, and


shall include all committees or subcommittees of any public body.


Public body shall include the Judicial Nominating Commission.


Public body shall not include the state judiciary, the Council on


Judicial Complaints when conducting, discussing, or deliberating any


matter relating to a complaint received or filed with the Council,


the Legislature, or administrative staffs of public bodies


including, but not limited to, faculty meetings and athletic staff


meetings of institutions of higher education when those staffs are


not meeting with the public body, or entry-year assistance


committees. Furthermore, public body shall not include the


multidisciplinary teams provided for in Section 1-9-102 of Title 10A


of the Oklahoma Statutes, in Section 10-115 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes, and in subsection C of Section 1-502.2 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes or any school board meeting for the sole


purpose of considering recommendations of a multidisciplinary team


and deciding the placement of any child who is the subject of the


recommendations. Furthermore, public body shall not include


meetings conducted by stewards designated by the Oklahoma Horse

Req. No. 1084 Page 2


Racing Commission pursuant to Section 203.4 of Title 3A of the


Oklahoma Statutes when the stewards are officiating at races or


otherwise enforcing rules of the Commission. Furthermore, public


body shall not include the board of directors of a Federally


Qualified Health Center or the postadjudication review boards


provided for in Sections 1116.2 and 1116.3 of Title 10 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Meeting” means the conduct of business of a public body by


a majority of its members being personally together or, as


authorized by Section 307.1 of this title, together pursuant to a


videoconference. Meeting shall not include informal gatherings of a


majority of the members of the public body when no business of the


public body is discussed;


3. “Regularly scheduled meeting” means a meeting at which the


regular business of the public body is conducted;


4. “Special meeting” means any meeting of a public body other


than a regularly scheduled meeting or emergency meeting;


5. “Emergency meeting” means any meeting called for the purpose


of dealing with an emergency. For purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, an emergency is defined as a situation involving injury


to persons or injury and damage to public or personal property or


immediate financial loss when the time requirements for public


notice of a special meeting would make such procedure impractical



Req. No. 1084 Page 3


and increase the likelihood of injury or damage or immediate


financial loss;


6. “Continued or reconvened meeting” means a meeting which is


assembled for the purpose of finishing business appearing on an


agenda of a previous meeting. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, only matters on the agenda of the previous meeting at


which the announcement of the continuance is made may be discussed


at a continued or reconvened meeting;


7. “Videoconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by interactive


telecommunication devices or technology and/or technology permitting


both visual and auditory communication between and among members of


the public body and/or between and among members of the public body


and members of the public. During any videoconference, both the


visual and auditory communications functions shall attempt to be


utilized; and


8. “Teleconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by


telecommunication devices and/or technology permitting auditory


communication between and among members of the public body and/or


between and among members of the public body and members of the


public.





Req. No. 1084 Page 4


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 307, as last


amended by Section 3, Chapter 180, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 307), is amended to read as follows:


Section 307. A. No public body shall hold executive sessions


unless otherwise specifically provided in this section.


B. Executive sessions of public bodies will be permitted only


for the purpose of:


1. Discussing the employment, hiring, appointment, promotion,


demotion, disciplining or resignation of any individual salaried


public officer or employee;


2. Discussing negotiations concerning employees and


representatives of employee groups;


3. Discussing the purchase or appraisal of real property;


4. Confidential communications between a public body and its


attorney concerning a pending investigation, claim, or action if the


public body, with the advice of its attorney, determines that


disclosure will seriously impair the ability of the public body to


process the claim or conduct a pending investigation, litigation, or


proceeding in the public interest;


5. Permitting district boards of education to hear evidence and


discuss the expulsion or suspension of a student when requested by


the student involved or the student’s parent, attorney or legal


guardian;


6. Discussing matters involving a specific disabled child;

Req. No. 1084 Page 5


7. Discussing any matter where disclosure of information would


violate confidentiality requirements of state or federal law;


8. Engaging in deliberations or rendering a final or


intermediate decision in an individual proceeding pursuant to


Article II of the Administrative Procedures Act;


9. Discussing matters involving safety and security at state


penal institutions or correctional facilities used to house state


inmates;


10. Discussing contract negotiations involving contracts


requiring approval of the State Board of Corrections, which shall be


limited to members of the public body, the attorney for the public


body, and the immediate staff of the public body. No person who may


profit directly or indirectly by a proposed transaction which is


under consideration may be present or participate in the executive


session;


11. Discussing the following:


a. the investigation of a plan or scheme to commit an act


of terrorism,


b. assessments of the vulnerability of government


facilities or public improvements to an act of


terrorism,


c. plans for deterrence or prevention of or protection


from an act of terrorism,



Req. No. 1084 Page 6


d. plans for response or remediation after an act of


terrorism,


e. information technology of the public body but only if


the discussion specifically identifies:


(1) design or functional schematics that demonstrate


the relationship or connections between devices


or systems,


(2) system configuration information,


(3) security monitoring and response equipment


placement and configuration,


(4) specific location or placement of systems,


components or devices,


(5) system identification numbers, names, or


connecting circuits,


(6) business continuity and disaster planning, or


response plans, or


(7) investigation information directly related to


security penetrations or denial of services,


f. the investigation of an act of terrorism that has


already been committed, or


g. for the purposes of this paragraph, the term


“terrorism” means any act encompassed by the


definitions set forth in Section 1268.1 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes; or

Req. No. 1084 Page 7


12. Reviewing and discussing mental health documents related to


a licensee under investigation or review by a professional licensing


board if:


a. the executive session is held only to review or


discuss mental health documents directly related to


the licensee or to receive testimony from relevant


witnesses as necessary for the board to make a


determination in the matter,


b. the documents reviewed or discussed are kept


confidential, privileged and not discoverable in civil


actions, and not made available to the public, and


c. the licensee is given the opportunity to be present


during any witness testimony or discussion of the


mental health documents.


C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of this


section, the following public bodies may hold executive sessions:


1. The Banking Board, as provided for under Section 306.1 of


Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. The Oklahoma Industrial Finance Authority, as provided for


in Section 854 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. The Oklahoma Development Finance Authority, as provided for


in Section 5062.6 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 1084 Page 8


4. The Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and


Technology, as provided for in Section 5060.7 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


5. The Oklahoma Health Research Committee for purposes of


conferring on matters pertaining to research and development of


products, if public disclosure of the matter discussed would


interfere with the development of patents, copyrights, products, or


services;


6. The Oklahoma Workers’ Compensation Commission for the


purposes provided for in Section 22 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


7. A review committee, as provided for in Section 855 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. The Child Death Review Board for purposes of receiving and


conferring on matters pertaining to materials declared confidential


by law;


9. The Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board as provided in


Section 1601 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. The Opioid Overdose Fatality Review Board, as provided in


Section 2-1001 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


11. All nonprofit foundations, boards, bureaus, commissions,


agencies, trusteeships, authorities, councils, committees, public


trusts, task forces or study groups supported in whole or part by


public funds or entrusted with the expenditure of public funds for

Req. No. 1084 Page 9


purposes of conferring on matters pertaining to economic development


including the transfer of property, financing, or the creation of a


proposal to entice a business to remain or to locate within their


jurisdiction if public disclosure of the matter discussed would


interfere with the development of products or services or if public


disclosure would violate the confidentiality of the business;


12. The Oklahoma Indigent Defense System Board for purposes of


discussing negotiating strategies in connection with making possible


counteroffers to offers to contract to provide legal representation


to indigent criminal defendants and indigent juveniles in cases for


which the System must provide representation pursuant to the


provisions of the Indigent Defense Act;


13. The Quality Investment Committee for purposes of discussing


applications and confidential materials pursuant to the terms of the


Oklahoma Quality Investment Act;


14. The Oklahoma Municipal Power Authority established pursuant


to Section 24-101 et seq. of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


in its role as an electric utility regulated by the federal


government, for purposes of discussing security plans and procedures


including, but not limited to, cybersecurity matters;


15. The Oklahoma Tax Commission for purposes of discussing


confidential taxpayer matters as provided in Section 205 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes, and in compliance with subsection E of


this section; and

Req. No. 1084 Page 10


16. The Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Board as


provided in Section 1 143 of this act Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes; and


17. The Judicial Nominating Commission for the purposes of


discussing the merits and qualifications of candidates for judicial


office to determine which candidates will be interviewed or solely


to meet with a candidate to discuss confidential information


relating to financial disclosure information or background checks.


Candidate interviews shall not be conducted in executive sessions


and Commissioners shall not vote or indicate how they intend to vote


in executive sessions.


D. Except as otherwise specified in this subsection, an


executive session for the purpose of discussing the purchase or


appraisal of real property shall be limited to members of the public


body, the attorney for the public body and the immediate staff of


the public body. No landowner, real estate salesperson, broker,


developer or any other person who may profit directly or indirectly


by a proposed transaction concerning real property which is under


consideration may be present or participate in the executive


session, unless they are operating under an existing agreement to


represent the public body.


E. No public body may go into an executive session unless the


following procedures are strictly complied with:



Req. No. 1084 Page 11


1. The proposed executive session is noted on the agenda as


provided in Section 311 of this title;


2. The executive session is authorized by a majority vote of a


quorum of the members present and the vote is a recorded vote; and


3. Except for matters considered in executive sessions of the


Banking Board and the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and which are


required by state or federal law to be confidential, any vote or


action on any item of business considered in an executive session


shall be taken in public meeting with the vote of each member


publicly cast and recorded.


F. A willful violation of the provisions of this section shall:


1. Subject each member of the public body to criminal sanctions


as provided in Section 314 of this title; and


2. Cause the minutes and all other records of the executive


session including tape recordings, to be immediately made public.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1084 TEK 1/19/2025 5:38:49 AM













Req. No. 1084 Page 12